North Dakota, session 69, HB1333.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 15.1-19 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Students - Duration of lunch.
1. A school district shall provide each student at least thirty minutes per day for a lunch
break, which must take place between ten a.m. and two p.m .
2. A high school student must be excused from the class immediately following the
student's lunch break for the number of minutes, if any, necessary to satisfy
subsection 1 each day of that semester, if :
a. The student obtains a written document from a school counselor at the high
school verifying the student may be excused under this section; and
b. Provides the document to the teacher of the affected class once per semester.
Page No. 1 25.0409.04000